Connecticut, session 2026, HB05549.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 9-19b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Except during the period between the last session for the
admission of electors prior to an election and the day following that
election, the town clerk or assistant town clerk, during office hours and
at the office of such official, may examine the qualifications of any
person applying in person to be admitted as an elector and approve such
application.
(b) Except during the period between the last session for the
admission of electors prior to an election and the day following that
election, either registrar of voters [,] or a deputy registrar or assistant
registrar appointed in accordance with the provisions of section 9-192
HB5549 / File No. 525 1

HB5549 File No. 525
may examine the qualifications of any person applying to be admitted
as an elector in the town and, except for applications submitted
pursuant to subdivision (4) of this subsection, approve such application
submitted in person (1) at the office of such official; (2) at any enrollment
session of the registrars of voters; (3) at any public place; (4) at any time
and at any place in the town, other than a public place; or (5) at any
public office of the Department of Motor Vehicles, Labor Department or
Department of Social Services [which] that is located in the town in
which the registrar, deputy registrar or assistant registrar serves, [if]
provided written notice of the date and time of such examination is
given seven days in advance thereof to the commissioner of such
department. Upon receipt of a written notice under subdivision (5) of
this subsection, the commissioner of the department may designate a
portion of the public office which shall be used for the admission of
electors. The other registrar, or any deputy or assistant registrar, shall
be permitted to be present during the admission of any person pursuant
to subdivisions (4) and (5) of this subsection. Applications accepted and
examined prior to the last session for admission of electors prior to an
election pursuant to subdivision (4) of this subsection may be approved
after such last session. The admission of any person pursuant to
subdivision (4) shall be effective on the date when both registrars
approve such application. The registrar who receives such application
from the applicant shall give written notice to the other registrar within
one business day after such receipt and the registrars shall forthwith act
on such applications. No rejection of any application under subdivision
(4) of this subsection shall be effective until the registrar has mailed to
the other registrar and the applicant a notice stating any reason for the
rejection. Any applicant whose application is rejected may appeal under
the provisions of section 9-31l.
(c) Such registrar, deputy or assistant registrar accepting applications
in accordance with subdivision (4) of subsection (b) of this section shall
provide the applicant with a receipt. Upon approval or disapproval of
the application, the registrars shall send a notice thereof by first-class
mail with instructions on the envelope that it be returned if not
deliverable at the address shown thereon. If such notice of approval is
HB5549 / File No. 525 2

HB5549 File No. 525
returned undeliverable, the registrars shall take the necessary action in
accordance with section 9-35 or 9-43.
(d) During the period between the last session for the admission of
electors prior to an election and the opening of the limited session for
the admission of electors held on the last weekday before such election
under section 9-17, the town clerk or assistant town clerk, during office
hours and at the office of such official, and either registrar of voters or a
deputy or assistant registrar, at the office of such official, may examine
the qualifications of any person applying in person to be admitted in
such town and approve the application of such person whose
qualifications as to age, citizenship or residence in the municipality were
attained after such last session and on or before the last weekday prior
to such election.
Sec. 2. Section 9-31a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section and section 9-31b, "permanently physically
disabled person" means a person who, by reason of a major defect or
infirmity of body, whether congenital or acquired by accident, injury or
disease, is permanently physically incapacitated to a degree that
prevents [him] such person and will continue to prevent [him] such
person from appearing in person at the office of the town clerk or
registrars of voters of the town where [he] such person temporarily or
permanently resides.
(b) (1) Any permanently physically disabled person may, in the
manner prescribed under this section and upon a form as prescribed
under section 9-31b, apply to the town clerk or either registrar of voters
of such town for examination and admission as an elector of any
Connecticut town.
[(1)] (2) In the case of a permanently physically disabled person
whose qualifications as to age, citizenship or residence in such town are
attained on or before the last session for admission of electors prior to
an election to be held in the town, the application shall be submitted so
HB5549 / File No. 525 3

HB5549 File No. 525
that it will be received by such town clerk or either registrar of voters
not later than such last session. Upon receipt of the application, the town
clerk or either registrar of voters shall notify the applicant of the day [,]
and the hour, such day to be [within] not later than ten days [of the
receipt of the application] after such receipt, at which an admitting
official shall meet with the applicant at the temporary or permanent
residence of the applicant.
[(2)] (3) In the case of a permanently physically disabled person
whose qualifications as to age, citizenship or residence in such town are
attained after the last session for admission of electors prior to an
election to be held in the town, the application shall be submitted so that
it will be received by such town clerk or either registrar of voters not
later than the opening of the limited session for the admission of electors
held [, under section 9-17,] on the last weekday prior to the election
pursuant to section 9-17. Upon receipt of the application, the town clerk
or either registrar of voters shall notify the applicant of the day [,] and
the hour, such day and hour to be not later than 5:00 p.m. on the last
weekday before the election, at which an admitting official shall meet
with the applicant at the temporary or permanent residence of the
applicant.
100 (c) Such admitting official shall meet at the appointed time with the
101 applicant for the purpose of examining [his] the applicant's
102 qualifications as an elector and for the purpose of admitting [him] the
103 applicant as an elector if the applicant is found qualified. Such official
104 shall make available to the applicant at such time, upon request, a copy
105 of the statement that specifies each eligibility requirement and contains
106 an attestation that the applicant meets each such requirement (1) in
107 video form, in accordance with procedures established by the registrars
108 of voters, and (2) in braille, large print and audio form. Such official shall
109 provide the applicant with a written notice of approval or disapproval
110 at that time, except as otherwise provided in section 9-19e. Any person
111 making application for registration under this section shall be entitled
112 to the privileges of an elector and party enrollment, if applicable, from
113 the time such application for admission as an elector is approved by the
HB5549 / File No. 525 4

HB5549 File No. 525
114 town clerk or registrars of voters of [his] the town of such person's
115 voting residence.
116 Sec. 3. Section 9-163bb of the general statutes, as amended by section
117 70 of public act 26-1, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
118 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
119 (a) (1) Early voting ballots received by the municipal clerk prior to the
120 day of an election or primary, and same-day election registration ballots
121 received by the municipal clerk prior to the day of a regular election,
122 shall be delivered by the municipal clerk to the registrars between six
123 o'clock a.m. and ten o'clock a.m. on the day of the election or primary.
124 (2) The ballot counters for such early voting ballots and same-day
125 election registration ballots shall proceed to the central counting
126 location or to the respective polling places when counting is to take
127 place pursuant to subsection (b) of section 9-147a at the time, between
128 six o'clock a.m. and ten o'clock a.m. on the day of the election or primary,
129 designated by the registrars of voters. At the time such ballots are
130 delivered to the ballot counters pursuant to [subsection (a) of this
131 section] subdivision (1) of this subsection, the ballot counters shall
132 perform any checking of such ballots and proceed, as nearly as possible,
133 as provided in section 9-150a, as amended by [this act] public act 26-1.
134 (b) On the first day of the early voting period, before the opening of
135 the polls, the moderator for the location designated for the conduct of
136 early voting shall unlock the voting tabulator for use and confirm that
137 the counter, which indicates the number of ballots that have been
138 inserted into the voting tabulator, is set at zero (000). Upon the close of
139 the polls each day during the early voting period, such moderator shall
140 record the number of ballots inserted into the voting tabulator, lock the
141 voting tabulator against voting and store the voting tabulator in
142 accordance with the written certification approved, or order for
143 corrective action issued, as applicable, by the Secretary of the State
144 pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 9-163aa, as
145 amended by [this act] public act 26-1. On each subsequent day of the
146 early voting period, before the opening of the polls, the moderator shall
HB5549 / File No. 525 5

HB5549 File No. 525
147 unlock the voting tabulator for use and confirm that the counter is set to
148 the same number that the moderator had recorded upon the close of the
149 polls the prior day for the number of ballots inserted into the voting
150 tabulator. Upon the close of the polls on the day of the election, the
151 moderator shall cause the vote totals for all candidates and questions to
152 be produced by the early voting tabulators.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 9-19b
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 9-31a
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 9-163bb
GAE Joint Favorable
HB5549 / File No. 525 6

HB5549 File No. 525
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes technical revisions to current elections statutes,
resulting in no fiscal impact to the state or municipalities.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5549 / File No. 525 7

HB5549 File No. 525
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5549
AN ACT CONCERNING TECHNICAL REVISIONS TO STATUTES
RELATED TO ELECTIONS.